Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2998.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 24-8 of the General Laws entitled "Construction and Maintenance of
State Roads" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
24-8-4.3. Traffic control – Use of crash truck - Cameras.
(a) Effective January 1, 2027, all contractors performing work on any project for the Rhode
Island department of transportation (RIDOT), Rhode Island turnpike and bridge authority (RITBA)
or any other road or bridge work in this state, shall have in place a traffic monitoring plan, which
shall be filed with RIDOT and/or RITBA as part of any bid or contract relative to the contract or
work being performed. As part of the traffic control plan, a contractor shall have on site a crash
truck/attenuator truck as referred to in § 24-8-4.2 which shall include traffic monitoring cameras.
The crash truck/attenuator truck shall be in place and the camera operational during any time in
which construction of maintenance work is being undertaken on any state highway and/or interstate
connector.
(b) The crash truck/attenuator truck shall be equipped with at least one camera facing
oncoming traffic if the work being performed is on a divided highway and, if not a divided highway,
a camera facing in both directions of any roadway on which the work is being performed.
(c) In the event any motor vehicle accident occurs at the work site and any state employee
or construction worker is injured or killed while engaged in the road work, a copy of all videos
generated from the cameras shall be provided to the Rhode Island state police and the department

of attorney general for purposes of identifying the operator of the vehicle, determining the cause of
the accident and shall be used in the course of any investigation and the prosecution of any person
determined to be at fault, whether through negligence, recklessness or deliberate conduct.
(d)(1) Every person/contractor convicted of a first violation of this section shall be guilty
of a misdemeanor and subject to imprisonment for not more than one year and/or a fine of not less
than five hundred dollars ($500) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000);
(2) Every person/contractor convicted of a second violation within a five (5) year period,
shall be guilty of a felony and subject to imprisonment for not more than two (2) years and/or a
fine of not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000);
(3) Every person/contractor convicted of a third or subsequent violation within a five (5)
year period, shall be guilty of a felony and subject to imprisonment for not more than five (5) years
and/or a fine of two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500).
(e) Every person/contractor who violates the provisions of this section may be barred from
contracting with the state and/or performing any construction or maintenance work on any RIDOT,
RITBA or other road or bridge work in this state for a period of up to five (5) years.
(f) Nothing contained in subsections (c) or (d) of this section shall limit the civil liability
of any person or contractor for violations of this section.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect on January 1, 2027.
========
LC005655
========
LC005655 - Page 2 of 3